dictsource/tr_rules
// Turkish translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Stress rule: Right-most vowel, but stop before the vowel which is
// marked as unstressed [%].

// Conditional rules:
// ?1  mbrola voices


.L01 ç f h k p q s ş t   // unvoiced consonants

.L02 ı a o u   // back vowels
.L03 i e ö ü î â ô û  // not-back vowels

.replace
`	'

.group a
        a        a
     @) a (_S1   a

     @) acak (_S4  adZak
     @) acakmış (_S7   adZakm%@S
     @) ayım (_S4  aj@m
     @) alım (_S4  aL@m
     @) asın (_S4  as@n

     @) avru (pa avr'u

.group â
	â	 a


.group b
        b        b
        bb       _:_!b   // Doubled voiceless consonants
                        // are spelled with pause before last one

.group c
        c        dZ
        cc       _:_!dZ
        ce (_S2  dZ%E

.group ç
        ç        tS
        çç       _:_!tS
        çe (_S2  tS%E

.group d
        d        d
        dd       _:_!d
	da (_S2  da
	de (_S2  de
	dan (_S3  dan
	den (_S3  den

        // declare these suffices so that preceding "ma/me" is unstressed
	dim (_S3   dim
	dik (_S3   dik
	din (_S3   din
	diniz (_S5 diniz
	di (_S2    di
	diler (_S5 dileR
	dım (_S3   d@m
	dık (_S3   d@k
	dın (_S3   d@n
	dınız (_S5 d@n@z
	dı (_S2    d@
	dılar (_S5 d@LaR
	dum (_S3   dum
	duk (_S3   duk
	dun (_S3   dun
	dunuz (_S5 dunuz
	du (_S2    du
	dular (_S5 duLar
	düm (_S3   dym
	dük (_S3   dyk
	dün (_S3   dyn
	dünüz (_S5 dynyz
	dü (_S2    dy
	düler (_S5 dyler

	dir (_S3  %diR
	dır (_S3  %d@R
	dur (_S3  %duR
	dür (_S3  %dyR

     _) d (eğil  'd


.group e
        e        e

     @) e (_S1   e

     @) ecek (_S4  edZek
     @) ecekmiş (_S7   edZekm%iS
     @) eyim (_S4  ejim
     @) elim (_S4  elim
     @) esin (_S4  esin


.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gg       _:_!g
        g (L03   J
   L03) g (K     J


.group ğ
        ğ        Q
     A) ğ        : 
?1   A) ğ (+     G     // mbrola

     a) ğa       :
     o) ğo       :
     u) ğu       :
     ö) ğö       :
     ü) ğü       :
     i) ğ        j
     e) ğ        j

     
.group h
        h        h


.group i
        i        i

     @) i (_S1	i

     @) im (_S2  %im
     @) iniz (_S4  %iniz
     @) iz (_S2  %iz
     @) iyor (_S4  ij%oR
     @) in (_S2  in


.group ı
        ı        @

     @) ı (_S1   @

     @) ım (_S2  %@m
     @) ınız (_S4  %@n@z
     @) ız (_S2  %@z
     @) ıyor (_S4  @j%oR
     @) ın (_S2  @n

.group î
        î        @

        
.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        k
        kk       _:_!k
	ken (_S3  %cen

.group l
        l        l
        l (L02   L
   L02) l (K     L

	la (_S2  %La
	le (_S2  %le

	lar (_S3  LaR
	ler (_S3  leR

	li (_S2  li
	lı (_S2  L@
	lu (_S2  Lu
	lü (_S2  ly

	lik (_S3  lik
	lık (_S3  L@k
	luk (_S3  Luk
	lük (_S3  lyk


.group m
        m        m

	ma (_S2  %ma
	me (_S2  %me


.group n
        n        n

     _) nda (_    nda   // 'nda
     _) nde (_    nde   // 'nde
     _) ndan (_   ndan  // 'ndan
     _) nden (_   nden  // 'nden

	nin (_S3  nin
	nın (_S3  n@n
	nun (_S3  nun
	nün (_S3  nyn

.group o
        o        o

.group ö
        ö        W

.group ô
	ô	o

.group p
        p        p
        pp       _:_!p

.group q
        q        k

.group r
        r        R
     A) r (A     *
     ğ) r (A     *

	ra (_S2  %Ra
	re (_S2  %Re
	ra (_N   Ra    // only an unstressed suffix if another suffix follows
	re (_N   Re


.group s
        s        s

	sınız (_S5  %s@n@z
	siniz (_S5  %siniz
	sunuz (_S5  %sunuz
	sünüz (_S5  %synyz

	sam (_S3   %sam   // if
	sak (_S3   %sak
	san (_S3   %san
	sanız (_S5 %san@z
	sa (_S2    %sa
	sem (_S3   %sem
	sek (_S3   %sek
	sen (_S3   %sen
	seniz (_S5 %seniz
	se (_S2    %se


.group ş
        ş        S

.group t
        t        t
        tt       _:_!t

	ta (_S2  ta
	te (_S2  te
	tan (_S3  tan
	ten (_S3  ten

   L01) tir (_S3  %tiR
   L01) tır (_S3  %t@R
   L01) tur (_S3  %tuR
   L01) tür (_S3  %tyR


.group u
        u        u

     @) u (_S1   u

     @) um (_S2  %um
     @) unuz (_S4  %unuz
     @) uz (_S2  %uz
     @) uyor (_S4  uj%oR
     @) un (_S2  un


.group ü
        ü        y

     @) ü (_S1   y

     @) üm (_S2  %ym
     @) ünüz (_S4  %ynyz
     @) üz (_S2  %yz
     @) üyor (_S4  yj%oR
     @) ün (_S2  yn



.group û
	û	u  

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks
     K) x        z


.group y
        y        j

	ya (_S2   ja
	ye (_S2   je
	yi (_S2   ji
	yı (_S2   j@
	yu (_S2   ju
	yü (_S2   jy

	yim (_S3  %jim
	yım (_S3  %j@m
	yum (_S3  %jum
	yüm (_S3  %jym

	yiz (_S3  %jiz
	yız (_S3  %j@z
	yuz (_S3  %juz
	yüz (_S3  %jyz

	yiniz (_S5  %jiniz
	yınız (_S5  %j@n@z
	yunuz (_S5  %junuz
	yünüz (_S5  %jynyz

	yla (_S3  %jLa
	yle (_S3  %jle

	yacak (_S5  jadZak
	yecek (_S5  jedZek
	yacakmış (_S8   jadZakm%@S
	yecekmiş (_S8   jedZekm%iS

	yayım (_S5  jaj@m
	yalım (_S5  jaL@m
	yasın (_S5  jas@n
	yeyim (_S5  jejim
	yelim (_S5  jelim
	yesin (_S5  jesin

	yken (_S4  jc%en


.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dolar
        ' (Pb     // split a word at ' and translate the first part separately.
	ə        E    // used in Aberbaijan
	ä        E
